New York, session 2025-2026, S172.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 200 of the workers' compensation law, as amended by 2 section 1 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 200. Short title. This article shall be known and may be cited as 5 the "disability [benefits law] and [the] paid family leave benefits 6 law." 7 § 2. Subdivisions 14, 15 and 22 of section 201 of the workers' compen- 8 sation law, subdivision 14 as amended and subdivisions 15 and 22 as 9 added by section 2 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 14. "A day of disability" means any day on which the employee was 12 prevented from performing work because of disability[, including any day 13 which the employee uses for family leave,] and for which the employee 14 has not received [his or her] the employee's regular remuneration. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00302-05-6 S. 172--B 2 1 15. "Family leave" shall mean any leave taken by an employee from 2 work: (a) to participate in providing care, including physical or 3 psychological care, for a family member of the employee made necessary 4 by a serious health condition of the family member; or (b) to bond with 5 the employee's child during the first twelve months after the child's 6 birth, or the first twelve months after the placement of the child for 7 adoption or foster care with the employee or on or after January first, 8 two thousand twenty-seven until January first, two thousand thirty-one, 9 for the six weeks immediately following a pregnancy loss at or after 10 twenty weeks of gestation if the employee who experienced the pregnancy 11 loss would have been deemed eligible to take family leave benefits under 12 this article based on an expected birth or placement and would otherwise 13 subsequently be deemed ineligible for family leave benefits due to preg- 14 nancy loss; or (c) because of any qualifying exigency as interpreted 15 under the family and medical leave act, 29 U.S.C.S § 2612(a)(1)(e) and 16 29 C.F.R. S.825.126[(a)(1)-(8)], arising out of the fact that the 17 spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent of the employee is on active 18 duty (or has been notified of an impending call or order to active duty) 19 in the armed forces of the United States. 20 22. "Health care provider" shall mean for the purpose of [family 21 leave] this article, a person licensed under article one hundred thir- 22 ty-one, one hundred thirty-one-B, one hundred thirty-two, one hundred 23 thirty-three, one hundred thirty-six, one hundred thirty-nine, one 24 hundred forty-one, one hundred forty-three, one hundred forty-four, one 25 hundred fifty-three, one hundred fifty-four, one hundred fifty-six or 26 one hundred fifty-nine of the education law or a person licensed under 27 the public health law, article one hundred forty of the education law or 28 article one hundred sixty-three of the education law. 29 § 3. Section 203-a of the workers' compensation law, as added by 30 section 4 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 31 read as follows: 32 § 203-a. Retaliatory action prohibited for [family] leave. 1. The 33 provisions of section one hundred twenty of this chapter and section two 34 hundred forty-one of this article shall be applicable to family and 35 disability leave. 36 2. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to diminish the rights, 37 privileges, or remedies of any employee under any collective bargaining 38 agreement or employment contract. 39 § 4. Section 203-b of the workers' compensation law, as added by 40 section 4 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 41 read as follows: 42 § 203-b. Reinstatement following [family] leave. Any eligible employee 43 of a covered employer who takes leave under this article shall be enti- 44 tled, on return from such leave, to be restored by the employer to the 45 position of employment held by the employee when the leave commenced, or 46 to be restored to a comparable position with comparable employment bene- 47 fits, pay and other terms and conditions of employment. The taking of 48 family or disability leave shall not result in the loss of any employ- 49 ment benefit accrued prior to the date on which the leave commenced. 50 Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle any restored 51 employee to the accrual of any seniority or employment benefits during 52 any period of leave, or any right, benefit or position to which the 53 employee would have been entitled had the employee not taken the leave. 54 § 5. Section 203-c of the workers' compensation law, as added by 55 section 4 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 56 read as follows: S. 172--B 3 1 § 203-c. Health insurance during [family] leave. In accordance with 2 the Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C. §§ 2601-2654), during any 3 period of family or disability leave the employer shall maintain any 4 existing health benefits of the employee in force for the duration of 5 such leave as if the employee had continued to work from the date [he or 6 she] the employee commenced family or disability leave until the date 7 [he or she] the employee returns to employment. 8 § 6. Section 203-c of the workers' compensation law, as amended by 9 chapter 72 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 § 203-c.Health insurance during [family] leave. In accordance with the 11 Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C. §§ 2601-2654), during any period 12 of family or disability leave the employer shall maintain any existing 13 health benefits of the employee in force for the duration of such leave 14 as if the employee had continued to work from the date such employee 15 commenced family or disability leave until the date such employee 16 returns to employment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, construction 17 employees shall maintain any existing union health plan or fund benefits 18 in force for the duration of family or disability leave as if the 19 construction employee had continued to work from the date they commenced 20 family or disability leave until the date the construction employee 21 returns to employment. Nothing herein prevents parties to a collective 22 bargaining agreement for construction employees from providing addi- 23 tional terms including, but not limited to, payment of health contrib- 24 utions for such employees on leave time, whether leave time is consid- 25 ered hours worked for purposes of eligibility in the health plan or 26 fund, or other terms that do not conflict with this section. 27 § 7. Section 204 of the workers' compensation law, as amended by 28 section 5 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 29 read as follows: 30 § 204. Disability and family leave during employment. 1. Disability 31 benefits shall be payable to an eligible employee for disabilities, 32 beginning with the eighth day of disability and thereafter during the 33 continuance of disability, subject to the limitations as to maximum and 34 minimum amounts and duration and other conditions and limitations in 35 this section and in sections two hundred five and two hundred six of 36 this article. Family leave benefits shall be payable to an eligible 37 employee for the first full day when family leave is required and there- 38 after during the continuance of the need for family leave, subject to 39 the limitations as to maximum and minimum amounts and duration and other 40 conditions and limitations in this section and in sections two hundred 41 five and two hundred six of this article. Successive periods of disabil- 42 ity or family leave caused by the same or related injury or sickness or 43 qualifying event shall be deemed a single period of disability or family 44 leave only if separated by less than three months. 45 2. (a) The weekly benefit for family leave that occurs (i) on or after 46 January first, two thousand eighteen shall not exceed eight weeks during 47 any fifty-two week calendar period and shall be fifty percent of the 48 employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed fifty percent of the 49 state average weekly wage, (ii) on or after January first, two thousand 50 nineteen shall not exceed ten weeks during any fifty-two week calendar 51 period and shall be fifty-five percent of the employee's average weekly 52 wage but shall not exceed fifty-five percent of the state average weekly 53 wage, (iii) on or after January first, two thousand twenty shall not 54 exceed ten weeks during any fifty-two week calendar period and shall be 55 sixty percent of the employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed 56 sixty percent of the state average weekly wage, and (iv) on or after S. 172--B 4 1 January first of each succeeding year, shall not exceed twelve weeks 2 during any fifty-two week calendar period and shall be sixty-seven 3 percent of the employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed 4 sixty-seven percent of the New York state average weekly wage in effect. 5 The superintendent of financial services shall have discretion to delay 6 the increases in the family leave benefit level provided in subpara- 7 graphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph by one or more calendar 8 years. In determining whether to delay the increase in the family leave 9 benefit for any year, the superintendent of financial services shall 10 consider: (1) the current cost to employees of the family leave benefit 11 and any expected change in the cost after the benefit increase; (2) the 12 current number of insurers issuing insurance policies with a family 13 leave benefit and any expected change in the number of insurers issuing 14 such policies after the benefit increase; (3) the impact of the benefit 15 increase on employers' business and the overall stability of the program 16 to the extent that information is readily available; (4) the impact of 17 the benefit increase on the financial stability of the disability and 18 family leave insurance market and carriers; and (5) any additional 19 factors that the superintendent of financial services deems relevant. If 20 the superintendent of financial services delays the increase in the 21 family leave benefit level for one or more calendar years, the family 22 leave benefit level that shall take effect immediately following the 23 delay shall be the same benefit level that would have taken effect but 24 for the delay. The weekly benefits for family leave that occurs on or 25 after January first, two thousand eighteen shall not be less than one 26 hundred dollars per week except that if the employee's wages at the time 27 of family leave are less than one hundred dollars per week, the employee 28 shall receive [his or her] the employee's full wages. Benefits may be 29 payable to employees for paid family leave taken intermittently or for 30 less than a full work week in increments of one full day or one fifth of 31 the weekly benefit. 32 (b) The weekly benefit which the disabled employee is entitled to 33 receive for the first twelve weeks of disability commencing: (i) on or 34 after January first, two thousand twenty-eight shall be fifty-five 35 percent of the employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed fifty 36 percent of the state average weekly wage; (ii) on or after January 37 first, two thousand twenty-nine shall be sixty percent of the employee's 38 average weekly wage but shall not exceed fifty-five percent of the state 39 average weekly wage; (iii) on or after January first, two thousand thir- 40 ty shall be sixty-seven percent of the employee's weekly average wage 41 but shall not exceed sixty percent of the state average weekly wage; and 42 (iv) on or after January first of each succeeding year, shall be sixty- 43 seven percent of the employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed 44 sixty-seven percent of the state average weekly wage. The weekly bene- 45 fit which the disabled employee is entitled to receive for the periods 46 of disability after the twelfth week of disability and through the twen- 47 ty-sixth week of disability on or after January first, two thousand 48 twenty-eight and each succeeding year shall be thirty percent of the 49 employee's average weekly wage but shall not exceed thirty percent of 50 the state average weekly wage. The chair of the workers' compensation 51 board, in consultation with the superintendent of financial services, 52 shall have discretion to increase the benefit level for the period of 53 disability after the twelfth week of disability through the twenty-sixth 54 week of disability, provided that such benefit shall not exceed sixty- 55 seven percent of the state average weekly wage. In determining whether 56 to increase the disability benefit for any year, the chair of the work- S. 172--B 5 1 ers' compensation board in consultation with the superintendent of 2 financial services shall consider factors including but not limited to 3 utilization of the current benefit, the expected utilization of any 4 increase, the need for a benefit increase, the current contribution cost 5 to employees and employers and the expected cost after any such benefit 6 increase; the current number of insurers issuing insurance policies 7 with a disability benefit and any expected change in the number of 8 insurers issuing such policies after the benefit increase; and any 9 additional factors that the chair of the workers' compensation board and 10 the superintendent of financial services deems relevant. The weekly 11 benefit which the disabled employee is entitled to receive for disabili- 12 ty leave that occurs on or after January first, two thousand twenty- 13 eight shall not be less than one hundred dollars per week except that if 14 the employee's wages at the time of disability leave are less than one 15 hundred dollars per week, the employee shall receive the employee's full 16 wages. The weekly benefit which the disabled employee is entitled to 17 receive for disability commencing on or after May first, nineteen 18 hundred eighty-nine and prior to January first, two thousand twenty- 19 eight shall be one-half of the employee's weekly wage, but in no case 20 shall such benefit exceed one hundred seventy dollars; except that if 21 the employee's average weekly wage is less than twenty dollars, the 22 benefit shall be such average weekly wage. The weekly benefit which the 23 disabled employee is entitled to receive for disability commencing on or 24 after July first, nineteen hundred eighty-four shall be one-half of the 25 employee's weekly wage, but in no case shall such benefit exceed one 26 hundred forty-five dollars; except that if the employee's average weekly 27 wage is less than twenty dollars, the benefit shall be such average 28 weekly wage. The weekly benefit which the disabled employee is entitled 29 to receive for disability commencing on or after July first, nineteen 30 hundred eighty-three and prior to July first, nineteen hundred eighty- 31 four shall be one-half of the employee's average weekly wage, but in no 32 case shall such benefit exceed one hundred thirty-five dollars nor be 33 less than twenty dollars; except that if the employee's average weekly 34 wage is less than twenty dollars the benefit shall be such average week- 35 ly wage. The weekly benefit which the disabled employee is entitled to 36 receive for disability commencing on or after July first, nineteen 37 hundred seventy-four, and prior to July first, nineteen hundred eighty- 38 three, shall be one-half of the employee's average weekly wage, but in 39 no case shall such benefit exceed ninety-five dollars nor be less than 40 twenty dollars; except that if the employee's average weekly wage is 41 less than twenty dollars, the benefit shall be such average weekly wage. 42 The weekly benefit which the disabled employee is entitled to receive 43 for disability commencing on or after July first, nineteen hundred 44 seventy and prior to July first, nineteen hundred seventy-four shall be 45 one-half of the employee's average weekly wage, but in no case shall 46 such benefit exceed seventy-five dollars nor be less than twenty 47 dollars; except that if the employee's average weekly wage is less than 48 twenty dollars the benefit shall be such average weekly wage. [For any 49 period of disability less than a full week, the benefits payable shall 50 be calculated by dividing the weekly benefit by the number of the 51 employee's normal work days per week and multiplying the quotient by the 52 number of normal work days in such period of disability.] Benefits may 53 be payable to employees for disability leave taken intermittently or for 54 less than a full work week in increments of one full day or one-fifth of 55 the weekly benefit. The weekly benefit for a disabled employee who is 56 concurrently eligible for benefits in the employment of more than one S. 172--B 6 1 covered employer shall, within the maximum and minimum herein provided, 2 be one-half of the total of the employee's average weekly wages received 3 from all such covered employers, and shall be allocated in the propor- 4 tion of [their] the employee's respective average weekly wage payments. 5 (c) Provided that the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subdivision 6 concerning benefits on or after January first, two thousand twenty-eight 7 and subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision three of 8 section two hundred nine of this article may be waived by a covered 9 employer subject to a collective bargaining agreement with a bona fide 10 labor organization in effect on January first, two thousand twenty-eight 11 for employees subject to such collective bargaining agreement for a 12 disability commencing between January first, two thousand twenty-eight 13 and until January first, two thousand thirty-one; and provided that for 14 such waiver to be valid, it shall explicitly reference this section and 15 be agreed to by the bona fide labor organization. Nothing herein shall 16 prevent a collective bargaining agreement from providing temporary disa- 17 bility benefits greater than the benefits required herein. 18 § 8. Subdivision 2 of section 206 of the workers' compensation law, as 19 amended by section 7 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is 20 amended to read as follows: 21 2. If an employee who is eligible for disability benefits under 22 section two hundred three or two hundred seven of this article is disa- 23 bled and has claimed or subsequently claims workers' compensation bene- 24 fits under this chapter or benefits under the volunteer firefighters' 25 benefit law or the volunteer ambulance workers' benefit law, and such 26 claim is controverted on the ground that the employee's disability was 27 not caused by an accident that arose out of and in the course of [his] 28 the employee's employment or by an occupational disease, or by an injury 29 in line of duty as a volunteer firefighter or volunteer ambulance work- 30 er, the employee shall be entitled in the first instance to receive 31 benefits under this article for [his or her] the employee's disability. 32 If benefits have been paid under this article in respect to a disability 33 alleged to have arisen out of and in the course of the employment or by 34 reason of an occupational disease, or in line of duty as a volunteer 35 firefighter or a volunteer ambulance worker, the employer or carrier or 36 the chair making such payment may, at any time before award of workers' 37 compensation benefits, or volunteer firefighters' benefits or volunteer 38 ambulance workers' benefits, is made, file with the board a claim for 39 reimbursement out of the proceeds of such award to the employee for the 40 period for which disability benefits were paid to the employee under 41 this article, and shall have a lien against the full award for 42 reimbursement, notwithstanding the provisions of section thirty-three of 43 this chapter or section twenty-three of the volunteer firefighters' 44 benefit law or section twenty-three of the volunteer ambulance workers' 45 benefit law provided the insurance carrier liable for payment of the 46 award receives, before such award is made, a copy of the claim for 47 reimbursement from the employer, carrier or chair who paid disability 48 benefits, or provided the board's decision and award directs such 49 reimbursement therefrom. 50 § 9. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 209 of the workers' 51 compensation law, as amended by section 10 of part SS of chapter 54 of 52 the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 53 (a) Disability benefits. (i) The contribution of each such employee to 54 the cost of disability benefits provided by this article shall be one- 55 half of one per centum of the employee's wages paid to [him or her] the S. 172--B 7 1 employee on and after July first, nineteen hundred fifty, but not in 2 excess of sixty cents per week. 3 (ii) Beginning January first, two thousand twenty-eight, the maximum 4 employee contribution that a covered employer is authorized to collect 5 from each employee for the cost of disability benefits provided by this 6 article shall be one-half of one per centum of the employee's wages but 7 shall not exceed two dollars and twenty cents per week provided, howev- 8 er, that the employee contribution shall be pursuant to subparagraph (i) 9 of this paragraph where such employee is covered under paragraph (c) of 10 subdivision two of section two hundred four of this article. 11 (iii) Beginning January first, two thousand thirty-one, the maximum 12 employee contribution that a covered employer is authorized to collect 13 from each employee for the cost of disability benefits provided by this 14 article shall be one-half of one per centum of the employee's wages, but 15 shall not exceed forty percent of the average of the combination of all 16 employee and employer contributions to disability benefits provided 17 pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision two of section two hundred four 18 of this article during the prior calendar year, as determined annually 19 by the superintendent of financial services pursuant to subsection (n) 20 of section four thousand two hundred thirty-five of the insurance law. 21 A self-insurer shall submit reports to the superintendent of financial 22 services for the purpose of determining forty percent of the average of 23 the combination of all employee and employer contributions to disability 24 benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision two of 25 section two hundred four of this article during the prior calendar year, 26 pursuant to subsection (n) of section four thousand two hundred thirty- 27 five of the insurance law. 28 § 10. The opening paragraph of section 211 of the workers' compen- 29 sation law, as amended by section 12 of part SS of chapter 54 of the 30 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 31 A covered employer, unless provided with a waiver pursuant to para- 32 graph (c) of subdivision two of section 204 of this article, shall, with 33 [his or her] such employer's own contributions and the contributions of 34 [his] such employer's employees, provide disability and after January 35 first, two thousand eighteen, family leave benefits to [his or her] such 36 employer's employees in one or more of the following ways: 37 § 11. The opening paragraph and subdivision 1 of section 214 of the 38 workers' compensation law, as amended by section 26 of part GG of chap- 39 ter 57 of the laws of 2013, are amended to read as follows: 40 There is hereby created a fund which shall be known as the special 41 fund for disability benefits to provide for the payment of [disability] 42 benefits under sections two hundred seven, two hundred thirteen and 43 attendance fees under section two hundred thirty-two of this article. 44 1. As promptly as practicable after April first, in each year, the 45 [chairman] chair shall ascertain the condition of the fund, and if as of 46 any such date the net assets of the fund shall be one million dollars or 47 more below the sum of twelve million dollars, the [chairman] chair shall 48 assess and collect an amount sufficient to restore the fund to an amount 49 equal to twelve million dollars.[.] Such assessment shall be included in 50 the assessment rate established pursuant to subdivision two of section 51 one hundred fifty-one of this chapter. Such assessments shall be depos- 52 ited with the commissioner of taxation and finance and transferred to 53 the benefit of such fund upon payment of debt service, if any, pursuant 54 to section one hundred fifty-one of this chapter. S. 172--B 8 1 § 12. Subdivision 1 of section 217 of the workers' compensation law, 2 as amended by section 16 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Written notice and proof of disability or proof of need for family 5 leave shall be furnished to the employer by or on behalf of the employee 6 claiming benefits or, in the case of a claimant under section two 7 hundred seven of this article, to the chair, within thirty days after 8 commencement of the period of disability. Additional proof shall be 9 furnished thereafter from time to time as the employer or carrier or 10 chair may require but not more often than once each week. Such proof 11 shall include a statement of disability by the employee's [attending 12 physician or attending podiatrist or attending chiropractor or attending 13 dentist or attending psychologist or attending certified nurse midwife 14 or family leave care recipient's health care provider, or in the case of 15 an employee who adheres to the faith or teachings of any church or 16 denomination, and who in accordance with its creed, tenets or principles 17 depends for healing upon prayer through spiritual means alone in the 18 practice of religion, by an accredited practitioner,] health care 19 provider containing facts and opinions as to such disability in compli- 20 ance with regulations of the chair. Failure to furnish notice or proof 21 within the time and in the manner above provided shall not invalidate 22 the claim but no benefits shall be required to be paid for any period 23 more than two weeks prior to the date on which the required proof is 24 furnished unless it shall be shown to the satisfaction of the chair not 25 to have been reasonably possible to furnish such notice or proof and 26 that such notice or proof was furnished as soon as possible; provided, 27 however, that no benefits shall be paid unless the required proof [of 28 disability] is furnished within the period of actual disability or fami- 29 ly leave that does not exceed the statutory maximum period permitted 30 under section two hundred four of this article. No limitation of time 31 provided in this section shall run as against any disabled employee who 32 is mentally incompetent, or physically incapable of providing such 33 notice as a result of a serious medical condition, or a minor so long as 34 such person has no guardian of the person and/or property. 35 § 13. Section 218 of the workers' compensation law, as added by chap- 36 ter 600 of the laws of 1949, subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 809 of 37 the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 38 § 218. [Disability benefit] Benefit rights inalienable. 1. Any agree- 39 ment by an employee to waive [his] the employee's rights under this 40 article shall be void. 41 2. Disability or family leave benefits payable under this article 42 shall not be assigned or released, except as provided in this article, 43 and shall be exempt from all claims of creditors and from levy, 44 execution and attachment or other remedy for recovery or collection of a 45 debt, which exemption may not be waived provided, however, that such 46 benefits shall be subject to an income execution or order for support 47 enforcement pursuant to section fifty-two hundred forty-one or fifty-two 48 hundred forty-two of the civil practice law and rules. 49 § 14. Section 221 of the workers' compensation law, as amended by 50 section 19 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to 51 read as follows: 52 § 221. Determination of contested claims for disability and family 53 leave benefits. In accordance with regulations adopted by the chair, 54 within twenty-six weeks of written notice of rejection of claim, the 55 employee may file with the chair a notice that [his or her] the employ- 56 ee's claim for disability or family leave benefits has not been paid, S. 172--B 9 1 and the employee shall submit proof of disability or entitlement to 2 family leave and of [his or her] the employee's employment, wages and 3 other facts reasonably necessary for determination of the employee's 4 right to such benefits. Failure to file such notice within the time 5 provided, may be excused if it can be shown not to have been reasonably 6 possible to furnish such notice and that such notice was furnished as 7 soon as possible. On demand the employer or carrier shall forthwith 8 deliver to the board the original or a true copy of the health care 9 provider's report, wage and employment data and all other documentation 10 in the possession of the employer or carrier with respect to such claim. 11 The chair or designee, shall have full power and authority to deter- 12 mine all issues in relation to every such claim for disability benefits 13 required or provided under this article, and shall file its decision in 14 the office of the [chairman] chair. Upon such filing, the [chairman] 15 chair shall send to the parties a copy of the decision. Either party may 16 present evidence and be represented by counsel at any hearing on such 17 claim. The decision of the board shall be final as to all questions of 18 fact and, except as provided in section twenty-three of this chapter, as 19 to all questions of law. Every decision shall be complied with in 20 accordance with its terms within ten days thereafter except as permitted 21 by law upon the filing of a request for review, and any payments due 22 under such decision shall draw simple interest from thirty days after 23 the making thereof at the rate provided in section five thousand four of 24 the civil practice law and rules. The chair shall adopt rules and regu- 25 lations to carry out the provisions of this article including but not 26 limited to resolution of contested claims and requests for review there- 27 of, and payment of costs for resolution of disputed claims by carriers. 28 Any designated process shall afford the parties the opportunity to pres- 29 ent evidence and to be represented by counsel in any such proceeding. 30 The chair shall have the authority to provide for alternative dispute 31 resolution procedures for claims arising under disability and family 32 leave, including but not limited to referral and submission of disputed 33 claims to a neutral arbitrator under the auspices of an alternative 34 dispute resolution association pursuant to article seventy-five of the 35 civil practice law and rules. Neutral arbitrator shall mean an arbitra- 36 tor who does not have a material interest in the outcome of the arbi- 37 tration proceeding or an existing and substantial relationship, includ- 38 ing but not limited to pecuniary interests, with a party, counsel or 39 representative of a party. Any determination made by alternative dispute 40 resolution shall not be reviewable by the board and the venue for any 41 appeal shall be to a court of competent jurisdiction. 42 § 15. Section 228 of the workers' compensation law, as added by 43 section 27 of part GG of chapter 57 of the laws of 2013, is amended to 44 read as follows: 45 § 228. Administrative expenses. 1. The estimated annual expenses 46 necessary for the workers' compensation board to administer the 47 provisions of the disability and paid family leave benefits law shall be 48 borne by all affected employers and included as part of the assessment 49 rate generated pursuant to subdivision two of section one hundred 50 fifty-one of this chapter. 51 2. Annually, as soon as practicable after the first day of April, the 52 chair and department of audit and control shall ascertain the total 53 amount of actual expenses. 54 § 16. Subsection (n) of section 4235 of the insurance law is amended 55 by adding a new paragraph 4 to read as follows: S. 172--B 10 1 (4)(A) The superintendent shall establish by September first of each 2 year the maximum employee contribution that a covered employer, as 3 defined in section two hundred two of the workers' compensation law, is 4 authorized to collect from each employee for the cost of disability 5 benefits provided pursuant to article nine of the workers' compensation 6 law through a group accident and health insurance policy or through a 7 self-funded employer for its employees. Beginning January first, two 8 thousand twenty-eight, the maximum employee contribution amount shall be 9 two dollars and twenty cents per week, and beginning January first, two 10 thousand thirty-one, the maximum employee contribution shall be one-half 11 of one percent of the employee's wages but shall not exceed forty 12 percent of the average of the combination of all employee and employer 13 contributions to disability benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (b) 14 of subdivision two of section two hundred four of the workers' compen- 15 sation law during the prior calendar year, which the superintendent 16 shall determine and publish on the department's website. 17 (B) A self-funded employer shall submit reports to the superintendent 18 for the purpose of determining forty percent of the average of the 19 combination of all employee and employer contributions to disability 20 benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision two of 21 section two hundred four of the workers' compensation law. A self-fund- 22 ed employer shall submit a report to the superintendent by July first, 23 two thousand twenty-seven that sets forth employee and employer contrib- 24 utions to disability benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of 25 subdivision two of section two hundred four of the workers' compensation 26 law for the year ending two thousand twenty-six, in a format determined 27 by the superintendent. Beginning April first, two thousand twenty- 28 eight, and annually thereafter, a self-funded employer shall submit a 29 report to the superintendent that sets forth employee and employer 30 contributions to disability benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (b) 31 of subdivision two of section two hundred four of the workers' compen- 32 sation law for the prior calendar year, in a format determined by the 33 superintendent. 34 § 17. Section 2605 of the insurance law is amended to read as follows: 35 § 2605. Penalty for violating workers' compensation law. The super- 36 intendent may impose a penalty not to exceed twenty-five hundred dollars 37 per violation upon any insurer required to be licensed under the 38 provisions of this chapter, if, after notice to and a hearing of such 39 insurer, [he] the superintendent finds it has unreasonably failed to 40 comply with the workers' compensation law. 41 § 18. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 42 policies issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on or after 43 January 1, 2028; provided, however, that the amendments to section 203-c 44 of the workers' compensation law made by section six of this act shall 45 take effect on the same date and in the same manner as section 5 of 46 chapter 72 of the laws of 2026 takes effect.